Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1. There are appropriated to the State Department  of Fish and Wildlife, for the
biennium beginning July 1, 2025, out of the General Fund, the following amounts, for the
following purposes:
(1) Fish Division.............................  $ 28,477,899
(2) Wildlife Division........................  $ 6,864,584
(3) Administrative Services
Division.....................................  $ 12,942,381
(4) Debt service ..............................  $ 2,973,972
(5) Capital improvement.................  $ 176,286
(6) State Police enforcement .......... $ 3,118,767
(7) Habitat Division ........................ $ 22,381,523
SECTION 2. Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the following amounts
are established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, as the maximum limits for payment
of expenses from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts and in-
cluding federal funds from the Pacific Coastal Salmon Recovery Fund,  but excluding lottery
funds and federal funds not  described in this section, collected or received by the State De-
partment of Fish and Wildlife, for the following purposes:
(1) Fish Division ............................. $ 98,713,966
(2) Wildlife Division........................ $ 48,549,815
(3) Administrative Services
Division..................................... $ 61,024,243
(4) Capital improvement................. $ 7,041,691
(5) Debt service .............................. $ 1,838,812
(6) State Police enforcement .......... $ 33,699,757
(7) Habitat Division ........................ $ 34,922,410
SECTION 3.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the following amounts
are established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, as the maximum limits for payment
of expenses from lottery moneys allocated from the Parks and  Natural Resources Fund to
the State Department of Fish and Wildlife, for activities and projects  to implement Article
XV, section 4 (8), of the Oregon Constitution, for the following purposes:
Enrolled House Bill 5009 (HB 5009-A) Page 1
(1) Fish Division............................. $ 5,962,755
(2) Wildlife Division........................ $ 1,598,009
(3) Habitat Division........................ $ 5,049
SECTION 4. Notwithstanding any  other law limiting expenditures, the amount of
$2,437,793 is established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, as the maximum limit  for
payment of expenses from  lottery moneys allocated from the Administrative Services Eco-
nomic Development Fund to the State Department of Fish and Wildlife for debt service.
SECTION 5. Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the following amounts
are established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, as the maximum limits for  payment
of expenses from  federal funds other than those described in section 2 of this 2025 Act col-
lected or received by the State Department of Fish and Wildlife, for the following purposes:
(1) Fish Division ............................. $131,189,919
(2) Wildlife Division........................ $ 42,618,670
(3) Administrative Services
Division..................................... $ 9,619,982
(4) Capital improvement................. $ 3,635,758
(5) Habitat Division ........................ $ 22,423,098
SECTION 6. This 2025 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency  is declared to exist, and this 2025 Act takes effect
July 1, 2025.
Passed by House June 13, 2025
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate June 19, 2025
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 5009 (HB 5009-A) Page 2